California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(8) “Digital infrastructure” means a cloud-based service provided remotely that allows a user to create, deploy, scale, or run the user’s own computer software on the service provider’s digital platform without managing, operating, or maintaining the user’s own infrastructure, including any hardware, software,
 networks, and facilities that are required to allow the user to create, deploy, scale, or run the user’s own computer software, required to complete the task.

(9) “Digital video game product” means an electronic, interactive game played for entertainment purposes by manipulating an input device to produce visual feedback on a screen that is transferred electronically or accessed remotely.

(10) “Digital visual work” means artwork created by using computer hardware and software processes which results in artwork in a digital format that is transferred electronically or accessed remotely.

(11) “Prewritten computer software” means computer software that is held or existing for general or repeated sale or lease, even if the prewritten software was initially developed on a custom basis or for in-house use, including the
 combination of two or more prewritten programs.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 10.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.2.

(a) “Accessed remotely” means to have accessed for consideration by use of a digital code, password, or other means prewritten computer software that resides on the vendor’s server or the server of a third party.

(b) “Tangible storage media” means any tangible device or material capable of storing a digital product, including, but not limited to, any internal or external drive, disk, memory card, or other item capable of storing a digital product.

(c) “Transferred electronically” means obtained by the purchaser, by means other than tangible storage media, in a manner that allows the purchaser to open, view, access, download, copy, possess, store, manipulate, update, or
 otherwise use the digital product.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 11.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.3.

“Tangible personal property,” for the purpose of this part, includes any leased fixtures if the lessor has the right to remove the fixtures upon breach or termination of the lease, unless the lessor is also the lessor of the realty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1777.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, “tangible personal property,” for purposes of this part, does not include telephone and telegraph lines, electrical transmission and distribution lines, and the poles, towers, or conduit by which they are supported or in which they are contained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1960.)
-------------------------------------------

6017.

“In this State” or “in the State” means within the exterior limits of the State of California and includes all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.

A licensed optometrist, physician and surgeon, pharmacist, or registered dispensing optician is a consumer of and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part as follows:

(a) In the case of a licensed optometrist or physician and surgeon with respect to the ophthalmic materials used or furnished by him or her, in the performance of his or her professional services in the diagnosis, treatment or correction of conditions of the human eye, including the adaptation of lenses or
 frames for the aid thereof.

(b) In the case of a licensed pharmacist only with respect to replacement contact lenses dispensed pursuant to Section 4124 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) In the case of a registered dispensing optician with respect to the dispensing of ophthalmic materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   Effective August 4, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 184.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.1.

A licensed veterinarian is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with respect to, drugs and medicines used or furnished by him or her in the performance of his or her professional services.

For the purposes of this section, “drugs and medicines” includes substances or preparations intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in animals and which is commonly recognized as a substance or preparation intended for this use. The term includes legend drugs, pills and capsules (other than vitamins),
 liquid medications, injected drugs, ointments, vaccines, intravenous fluids, and medicated soaps if those soaps are available only to veterinarians. The term does not include vitamins, shampoos, pet foods, prescription diet foods, artificial diets, flea powders, and flea sprays.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1585, Sec. 2.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.2.

(a) A qualified veteran may receive from the state a qualified repayment if all provisions of this section are satisfied.

(b) The procedures set forth in this section shall be the procedure and remedy for the claims for a repayment of taxes, interest, or penalties paid by a qualified veteran under the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001)), Section 35 of Article XIII of the
 California Constitution, local sales tax imposed in accordance with the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)), and local transactions and use taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) during the eight-year period beginning on and after April 1, 2002, and before April 1, 2010.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, a “qualified veteran” means a person who meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The person met the requirements of a qualified itinerant vendor as set forth in Section 6018.3 during the period in which the sales were made.

(B) The person paid to the board taxes imposed under the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001)), Section 35 of Article
 XIII of the California Constitution, taxes imposed in accordance with the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)), and transactions and use taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) during the period beginning April 1, 2002, and before April 1, 2010, for which no sales tax reimbursement was collected from customers, and also paid any interest or penalties associated with those tax liabilities.

(2) “Qualified repayment” means an amount equal to the amount described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), less any amounts previously refunded, credited, or paid to a qualified veteran through any means whatsoever.

(d) (1) Before January 1, 2016, a qualified veteran may file a claim for a qualified repayment with the board.

(2) The claim shall be in writing, and shall be completed in accordance with any instructions or regulations as the board may prescribe, including, but not limited to, proof of payment of the tax, interest, or penalties described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(3) On or before March 1, 2016, the board shall certify to the Controller the amount of qualified repayments to be made to each qualified veteran pursuant to this section. The total amount of money available to make qualified repayments shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). If the total amount of claims filed exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the board shall determine the pro rata share due to each qualified veteran based on the proportion each claim bears to the total amount of claims and shall report that amount for certification.

(4) There is hereby appropriated fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) from the General Fund to the board to make the payments of qualified repayments to qualified veterans.

(5) No interest shall be paid on any qualified repayment made pursuant to this section.

(6) (A) On or before May 1, 2016, the board shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, and the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, the name of each qualified veteran who was issued a qualified repayment pursuant to this section and the amount of the qualified repayment.

(B) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subparagraph (A) is inoperative on May 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the
 Government Code, and the report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(7) Upon notification by the board, the Controller shall transfer any balance remaining from the amount appropriated in paragraph (4) back to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 643, Sec. 2.   (AB 919)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.4.

A licensed chiropractor is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with respect to, vitamins, minerals, dietary supplements, and orthotic devices used or furnished by him in the performance of his professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1182.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.5.

A licensed podiatrist is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with respect to, the prosthetic materials and inlays used or furnished by him in the performance of his professional services in the diagnosis, treatment, or correction of conditions of the human foot, including the adaptation of arch supports or special footgear for the aid thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.6.

(a) Any person who received no more than 20 percent of his or her total gross receipts from the alteration of garments during the preceding calendar year is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with respect to, property used or furnished by that person in altering new or used clothing, provided that both of the following apply:

(1) That person operates a location or locations as a pickup and delivery point for garment cleaning, or provides spotting and pressing services on the premises but not garment cleaning, or operates a garment cleaning or dyeing plant on the premises.

(2) Seventy-five percent or more of that person’s total gross receipts represent charges for garment cleaning or dyeing services.

(b) Sales tax shall not apply to the charges for alterations specified in subdivision (a). However, that person is a retailer of any other tangible personal property sold to consumers in the regular course of business and sales tax shall apply to the gross receipts from those sales.

(c) For the purpose of this section:

(1) “Cleaning” means wet cleaning and drycleaning.

(2) “Wet cleaning” means the process of cleaning a garment by immersion in water, or by applying manually or by any mechanical device, water, or any detergent and water, or by spraying or brushing the garment with water or water and any detergent, or water vapor, or steam, and includes self-service or coin-operated equipment in whole or in part.

(3) “Drycleaning” means the process of cleaning or renovating wearing apparel, feathers, furs, hats, fabrics, household items, or textiles by immersion and agitation, spraying, vaporization, or immersion only, in a volatile, commercially moisture-free solvent or by the use of a volatile or inflammable product, applied either manually or by means of a mechanical appliance and including self-service or coin-operated equipment in whole or in part.

(4) “Dyeing” means the process of coloring wearing apparel, feathers, furs, hats, fabrics, or textiles by the use of aniline dyes, mordants, or acids, with or without steam, excluding, however, the use of any dye or combination of dyes which is directly soluble or dispersible in water and which does not require chemical alteration of its structure for application, where that dye or combination of dyes is applied to cotton, viscose rayon, or cuprammonium rayon other than wearing apparel.

(5) “Spotting” means the process of removing spots or stains or localized areas of soil from a garment, either before or after, and with or without drycleaning or wet cleaning, by brushing, spraying, or other means of manual or mechanical application, other than immersion, with water, detergents, and volatile or inflammable solvents, chemicals, or any, or all of them.

(6) “Pressing” means the process of restoring the garment to the original shape, dimensions, or contour thereof, or to those in which the same was received from the customer, or as directed by the customer, and the removal of wrinkles, stresses, bulges, and impressions, imprint marks and shine, from a garment by the application of pressure, heat, moisture, water vapor, or steam, or all of them, whether applied manually, or by any mechanical means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 212.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.7.

A licensed hearing aid dispenser is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with respect to hearing aids sold or furnished by him or her.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1576, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1984.   Operative January 1, 1985, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1576.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.8.

The Department of Transportation is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with respect to, passenger transportation vehicles, including, but not limited to, rail passenger cars, locomotives, other rail vehicles, bus and van fleets, and ferryboats, which it sells to and leases back from any person pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 14060) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1510, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.10.

(a) An all-volunteer fire department is a consumer, and shall not be considered a retailer within this part, of all tangible personal property sold by it, including, but not limited to, hot prepared food products and clothing, if the profits are used solely and exclusively in furtherance of the purposes of the all-volunteer fire department.

(b) For purposes of this section, an “all-volunteer fire department” means an organization that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) A member shall not be paid a regular salary, but a member may be compensated on an hourly or per incident basis.

(2) The purpose of the organization is to protect the lives, property, and environment within a designated geographical area from fires, disasters, and emergency incidents through education, prevention, training, and emergency response.

(3) The organization is regularly organized for volunteer fire department purposes and qualifies as an exempt organization, either under Section 23701d or 23701f of this code or under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, having official recognition and full or partial support of the government of the county, city, or district in which the volunteer fire department is located, and that has functions having an exclusive connection with the prevention and extinguishing of fires within the area of the county, city, or district
 extending official recognition for the benefit of the public generally and to lessen the burdens of the entity of government that would otherwise be obligated to furnish that fire protection.

(c) This section shall not apply if an all-volunteer fire department, in each of the two preceding calendar years, has gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more.

(d) For the purpose of complying with Section 41, with respect to the tax expenditure authorized by this section, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The specific purposes of this tax expenditure are all of the following:

(A) To ensure that the entire gross amount of fundraisers continues to stay with all-volunteer fire departments and helps provide critically needed equipment and services.

(B) To help all-volunteer fire departments through this critical time.

(C) To ensure all-volunteer fire departments can afford necessary equipment during fire season.

(2) For the purpose of aiding the Legislature in determining whether this section accomplishes the purposes described in paragraph (1), the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall annually estimate the revenue loss associated with the tax expenditure created by this section.

(3) The California
 Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall report, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, the information described in paragraph (2) to the Legislature before each year beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (SB 87)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6019.

Every individual, firm, copartnership, joint venture, trust, business trust, syndicate, association or corporation making more than two retail sales of tangible personal property during any 12-month period, including sales made in the capacity of assignee for the benefit of creditors, or receiver or trustee in bankruptcy, shall be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part in his or its individual, firm, copartnership, joint venture, trust, business trust, syndicate, associate or corporate capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 870.)
-------------------------------------------

6020.

Producers of X-ray films or photographs for the purpose of diagnosing medical or dental conditions of human beings, excluding use of those products for purely cosmetic purposes, are the consumers of materials and supplies used in the production thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 301, Sec. 1.   Effective June 22, 1982.   Operative October 1, 1982, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

6021.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sales tax applies to the receipts of operators of vending machines located on Army, Navy or Air Force installations and dispensing tangible personal property of a kind the gross receipts from the retail sale of which are subject to tax. This section shall not be deemed to require payment of sales tax measured by receipts of such operators who lease the machines to exchanges of the Army, Air Force, Navy or Marine Corps which acquire title to and sell the merchandise through the machines to authorized purchasers from such exchanges.

The term “operator,” as used herein, means any person
 who owns or possesses vending machines and who controls the operations of the machines, as by placing the merchandise therein or removing the coins therefrom, and who has access thereto for any purpose connected with the sale of merchandise through the machines, and whose compensation is based, in whole or in part, upon receipts from sales made through such machines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

6022.

“Vehicle” and “motor vehicle,” as used in this part, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in Sections 415 and 670 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1858.)
-------------------------------------------

6023.

“Mobile transportation equipment” includes equipment such as railroad cars and locomotives, buses, trucks (except “one-way rental trucks”), truck tractors, truck trailers, dollies, bogies, chassis, reusable cargo shipping containers, aircraft and ships, and tangible personal property which is or becomes a component part of such equipment. “Mobile transportation equipment” does not include passenger vehicles as defined in Section 465 of the Vehicle Code, trailers and baggage containers designed for hauling by passenger vehicles, or “one-way rental trucks” as defined and identified pursuant to Section 6024.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1777.)
-------------------------------------------

6024.

“One-way rental trucks” are motortrucks of a kind required to be registered under the Vehicle Code, not exceeding the manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 24,000 pounds, which are principally employed by a person in the rental business in being leased out for short-term periods of not more than 31 days to individual customers for one-way or local hauling of personal property of the customers, and which upon acquisition or being employed in this state by the person are identified to the board, in such manner as the board may prescribe, for employment in such one-way or local hauling. Upon the leasing of such a truck to a customer, the person shall make known to the
 customer the fact that the vehicle is designated as a one-way rental truck and any taxes imposed by this part which are payable measured by the rentals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1777.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Streamlined Sales Tax Project [6025. - 6031.]

6025.

This chapter shall be known as and referred to as the “Streamlined Sales Tax Project.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 702, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6026.

For purposes of this act:

(a) “Agreement” means the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement.

(b) “Board” means the board of governance, as defined in this act, or the board’s designee.

(c) “Certified automated system” means software certified jointly by the states that are signatories to the agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a transaction,
 determine the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate state, and maintain a record of the transaction.

(d) “Certified service provider” means an agent certified jointly by the states that are signatories to the agreement to perform all of the seller’s sales tax functions.

(e) “Person” means an individual, trust, estate, fiduciary, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, corporation, or any other legal entity.

(f) “Sales tax” means the tax levied by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(g) “Purchaser” means a person to whom a sale of tangible personal property is made or to whom a service is provided.

(h) “Seller” means any person making sales, leases, or rentals of personal property of services.

(i) “Sourcing” means determining the tax situs of a transaction.

(j) “State” means any state of the United States and the District of Columbia.

(k) “Signatory state” means a state that has entered into the agreement.

(l) “Use tax” means the tax levied by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 702, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6027.

(a) There is created in state government a Board of Governance consisting of two Members of the Senate chosen by the Senate Committee on Rules, one of whom shall belong to the majority party and one of whom shall belong to the minority party, two Members of the Assembly chosen by the Speaker of the Assembly, one of whom shall belong to the majority party and one of whom shall belong to the minority party, one member of the State Board of Equalization, one member of the Franchise Tax Board, and one member of the Governor’s Department of
 Finance.

(b) The board may represent this state in all meetings, limited only to those states that are also authorized by statute to enter into the agreement. The board shall vote on behalf of this state and shall represent the position of this state in all matters relating to the adoption of or amendments to the agreement.

(c) The board shall report quarterly to the Assembly and Senate Revenue and Taxation Committees on the board’s progress in negotiating the agreement and shall recommend to the committees the state statutes required to be added, amended, or otherwise modified for purposes of substantially complying with the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 702, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6028.

The state’s decision to join the Streamlined Sales Tax Project shall not invalidate, amend, or otherwise modify, in whole or in part, any provision of the law of this state. Implementation of any provision of the agreement in this state, whether adopted before, at, or after this state’s adoption of the agreement, shall be exclusively done by a separate act or acts of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 702, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6029.

The board may not enter into the agreement unless the agreement requires each state to abide by the following requirements:

(a) The agreement shall set restrictions to limit over time the number of state rates.

(b) The agreement shall establish uniform standards for the following:

(1) The sourcing of transactions to taxing jurisdictions.

(2) The administration of exempt sales.

(3) Sales and use tax returns and remittances.

(c) The agreement shall provide a central electronic registration system that allows a seller to register to collect and remit sales and use taxes for all signatory states.

(d) The agreement shall provide that registration with the central registration system and the collection of sales and use taxes in the signatory states does not by itself determine whether the seller has nexus with a state for any tax.

(e) The agreement shall provide for reduction of the burdens of complying with local sales and use taxes through the following:

(1) Restricting variances between the state and local taxes bases.

(2) Requiring states to administer any sales and use taxes levied by local jurisdictions within the state so that sellers collecting and remitting these taxes will not have to register or file returns with, remit funds to, or be subject to independent audits from local taxing jurisdictions.

(3) Restricting the frequency of changes in local sales and use tax rates and setting effective dates for the application of local jurisdictional boundary changes to local sales and use taxes.

(4) Providing notice of changes in local sales and use tax rates and of changes in the boundaries of local taxing jurisdictions.

(f) The agreement shall outline any monetary allowances that are to
 be provided by the states to sellers or certified service providers. The agreement shall allow for a joint public and private sector study of the compliance cost on sellers and certified service providers to collect sales and use taxes or state and local governments under various levels of complexity.

(g) The agreement shall require each state to certify compliance with the terms of the agreement prior to joining and to maintain compliance, under the laws of the member state, with all provisions of the agreement while a member.

(h) The agreement shall require each state to adopt a uniform policy for certified service providers that protects the privacy of consumers and maintains the confidentiality of tax information.

(i) The agreement shall provide for the appointment of an advisory council of private sector
 representatives and an advisory council of nonmember state representatives to consult with in the administration of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 702, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6030.

The agreement is an accord among individual cooperating sovereigns in furtherance of their governmental functions. The agreement provides a mechanism among the member states to establish and maintain a cooperative, simplified system for the application and administration of sales and use taxes under the duly adopted law of each member state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 702, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6031.

(a) The agreement shall bind and inure only to the benefit of this state and the other member states. No person, other than a member state, is an intended beneficiary of the agreement. Any benefit to a person other than a state is established by the law of this state and the other member states and not by the terms of the agreement.

(b) Consistent with subdivision (a), no person shall have any cause of action or defense under the agreement or by virtue of this state’s decision
 to join the Streamlined Sales Tax Project. No person may challenge, in any action brought under any provision of law, any action or inaction by any department, agency, or other instrumentality of this state, or any political subdivision of this state on the ground that the action or inaction is inconsistent with the agreement.

(c) No law of this state, or the application thereof, may be declared invalid as to any person or circumstance on the ground that the provision or application is inconsistent with the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 702, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.7. Marketplace Facilitator Act [6040. - 6049.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [6040. - 6041.6.]

6040.

This chapter shall be known as and referred to as the Marketplace Facilitator Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.   (AB 147)   Effective April 25, 2019.   Section operative October 1, 2019, pursuant to Sec. 6049.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6041.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Marketplace” means a physical or electronic place, including, but not limited to, a store, booth, internet website, catalog, television or radio broadcast, or a dedicated sales software application, where a marketplace seller sells or offers for sale tangible personal property for delivery in this state regardless of whether the tangible personal property, marketplace seller, or marketplace has a physical presence in this state.

(b) “Marketplace facilitator” means a person who contracts with marketplace sellers to facilitate for consideration, regardless of whether deducted
 as fees from the transaction, the sale of the marketplace seller’s products through a marketplace operated by the person or a related person and who does both of the following:

(1) Directly or indirectly, through one or more related persons, engages in any of the following:

(A) Transmitting or otherwise communicating the offer or acceptance between the buyer and seller.

(B) Owning or operating the infrastructure, electronic or physical, or technology that brings buyers and sellers together.

(C) Providing a virtual currency that buyers are allowed or required to use to purchase products from the seller.

(D) Software development or research and development activities related to any of the activities described in paragraph (2), if such activities are directly related to a marketplace operated by the person or a related person.

(2) Directly or indirectly, through one or more related persons, engages in any of the following activities with respect to the marketplace seller’s products:

(A) Payment processing services.

(B) Fulfillment or storage services.

(C) Listing products for sale.

(D) Setting prices.

(E) Branding sales as those
 of the marketplace facilitator.

(F) Order taking.

(G) Providing customer service or accepting or assisting with returns or exchanges.

(c) “Marketplace seller” means a person who has an agreement with a marketplace facilitator and makes retail sales of tangible personal property through a marketplace owned, operated, or controlled by a marketplace facilitator, even if that person would not have been required to hold a seller’s permit or permits, or required to collect the taxes imposed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201), or a fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001), had the sale not been made through that
 marketplace.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 421, Sec. 1.   (AB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Section operative October 1, 2019, pursuant to Sec. 6049.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6041.1.

Newspapers, internet websites, and other entities that advertise tangible personal property for sale, refer purchasers to the seller by telephone, internet link, or other similar means to complete the sale, and do not participate further in the sale are not facilitating a sale under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 34, Sec. 2.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Section operative October 1, 2019, pursuant to Sec. 6049.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6041.2.

For purposes of this chapter, the following shall apply:

(a) A person is related to another person if both persons are related to each other pursuant to Section 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder.

(b) (1) A “fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001)” shall include a charge pursuant to the Lead-Acid Battery Recycling Act of 2016 (Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 25215) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code), a lumber products assessment pursuant to Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 4629) of Chapter 8 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, a fee imposed pursuant to the Electronic Waste Recycling Act of 2003 (Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 42460) of Part 3 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code), and a California tire fee pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 42885) of Chapter 17 of Part 3 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) A “fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001)” shall not include the fee administered pursuant to Part 21.1 (commencing with Section 42100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6041.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6041, a person that is a delivery network company is not a marketplace facilitator for purposes of this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Delivery network company” means a business entity that
 maintains an internet website or mobile application used to facilitate delivery services for the sale of local products.

(2) “Delivery services” means the pickup of one or more local products from a local merchant and delivery of the local products to a customer. “Delivery services” do not include any delivery requiring over 75 miles of travel from the local merchant to the customer.

(3) “Local merchant” means a third-party merchant, including, but not limited to, a kitchen, restaurant, grocery store, retail store, convenience store, or business of another type, that is not under common ownership or control with the delivery network company.

(4) “Local product” means any item, including food, other than freight, mail, or a package to which postage has been affixed.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a delivery network company that meets the definition set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 6041 may elect, in a reasonable manner and duration prescribed by the department, to be deemed a marketplace facilitator pursuant to this chapter. Consistent with this section, the department shall adopt regulations that establish the criteria for obtaining and retaining an election to be a marketplace facilitator pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 34, Sec. 4.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Section operative October 1, 2019, pursuant to Sec. 6049.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6041.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6041, a person that is a vehicle rental broker is not a marketplace facilitator with respect to the facilitation, for a commission, fee, or other consideration, of a passenger vehicle rental on behalf of a rental company that is not a related person for purposes of this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this section,
 the following definitions apply:

(1) “Optional accessory” includes, but is not limited to, a child seat, a GPS navigation system, snow chains or other traction device, and a ski rack.

(2) “Passenger vehicle” has the same meaning as defined in Section 465 of the Vehicle Code.

(3) “Passenger vehicle rental” means any lease of a passenger vehicle, including any optional accessory, which is classified as a “continuing sale” and a “continuing purchase” in accordance with Sections 6006.1 and 6010.1.

(4) “Rental company” means a person or entity in the business of leasing passenger vehicles to the public and that is registered with the
 department under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201).

(5) “Vehicle rental broker” means a person that facilitates, for a commission, fee, or other consideration, passenger vehicle rentals through an online marketplace owned, operated, or controlled by the person or a related person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.   (SB 1312)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration and Collection [6042. - 6045.]

6042.

A marketplace facilitator shall be considered the seller, retailer, and dealer for each sale facilitated through its marketplace for purposes of determining whether the marketplace facilitator is required to register with the department under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201), or under any other law that imposes a fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001), in addition to each sale for which the marketplace facilitator is the seller, retailer, dealer, or any combination of the three, under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6001), or any other law that imposes a fee administered pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 421, Sec. 3.   (AB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Section operative October 1, 2019, pursuant to Sec. 6049.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6043.

A marketplace facilitator that is registered with the department or required to register with the department under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201) and that facilitates a retail sale of tangible personal property by a marketplace seller is the retailer selling or making the sale of the tangible personal property sold through its marketplace for purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.   (AB 147)   Effective April 25, 2019.   Section operative October 1, 2019, pursuant to Sec. 6049.5.)